Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201244-8107
Insurer; duties; director of
Insurance; powers; violations.

(1) An
insurer is responsible for compliance with the Nebraska Protection in Annuity
Transactions Act. If a violation occurs, either because of the action or inaction
of the insurer or its insurance producer, the Director of Insurance
may order:

(a) An insurer to take reasonably appropriate corrective action for
any consumer harmed by an insurance producer's or insurer's violation of the act; and

(b) An insurance producer to take reasonably appropriate corrective
action for any consumer harmed by the insurance producer's violation of the
act.

(2) A violation of the act shall
be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance under the Unfair
Insurance Trade Practices Act.

(3) The director may reduce or eliminate any applicable penalty under
section 44-1529 for a violation of subsection (1) or (2) of section 44-8106
or subdivision (4)(b) of such section if
corrective action for the consumer was taken promptly after a violation was
discovered or the violation
was not part of a pattern or practice.

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 32;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 27.
July 19, 2012
Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.